Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-820
Violations; civil proceedings; subpoena; may issue to any county.

Whenever it shall appear to the court before which any civil proceeding under sections 59-801 to 59-831 shall be pending that the ends of justice require that other parties shall be brought before the court, the court may cause them to be summoned whether they reside in the county where the court is held or not, and subpoenas to that end may be served in any county by the sheriff thereof.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 17, p. 644;

R.S.1913, § 4061;

C.S.1922, § 3464;

C.S.1929, § 59-817;

R.S.1943, § 59-820;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 9.